ko: 팬 타공 유형: 구멍 뚫림; 솔리드; 기타
fi: Vuoan rei'ityksen tyyppi: Rei'itetty; Kiinteä; Muu
nb: Perforeringstype for panne: Perforert; Fast; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de perfuração da panela: Perfurado; Maciço; Outro
sv: Typ av perforering av panna: Perforerad; Solid; Övrigt
ja: 型の穴タイプ: ミシン目; ソリッド; その他
fr: Type de perforation du moule: Perforé; Solide; Autre
zh-TW: 鍋具穿孔類型: 穿孔式; 實心; 其他
pl: Typ perforacji patelni: Perforowane; Pełne; Pozostałe
bg-BG: Тип перфорация на тигана: Перфорирано; Плътно; Друго
tr: Tava delik tipi: Perfore; Düz; Diğer
sl-SI: Vrsta perforacije ponve: Perforirana; Trden; Druga
zh-CN: 盘体穿孔类型: 穿孔; 实心; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul de perforație a tigăii: Perforată; Solidă; Altele
nl: Perforatietype pan: Geperforeerd; Stevig; Overig
ru: Тип перфорации формы: Перфорированная; Цельная; Другая
da: Bageforms perforeringstype: Perforeret; Solid; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de perfuração da panela: Perfurado; Sólido; Outro
el: Τύπος διάτρησης ταψιού: Διάτρητο; Στερεάς μορφής; Άλλο
hu: Serpenyő perforáció típusa: Perforált; Szilárd; Egyéb
it: Tipo di perforazione della padella: Perforata; Solido; Altro
en: Pan perforation type: Perforated; Solid; Other
de: Pfannenperforationstyp: Perforiert; Solide; Sonstiges
th: ประเภทการเจาะรูของกระทะ: แบบเจาะรู; แผ่นตัน; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ perforace nádoby: Perforovaný povrch; Plný povrch (bez perforací); Jiné
lt-LT: Kepimo formos perforacijos tipas: Perforuotas; Kietas; Kita
vi: Loại đục lỗ của chảo: Đục lỗ; Rắn; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta perforacije tave: Perforirani; Čvrsti; Ostalo
es: Tipo de perforación del molde: Perforado; Sólido; Otros
sk-SK: Typ perforácie panvice: Perforovaná; Pevná; Iné